Utah statutes.
53B-17-506.   Agreements with Department of Transportation regarding research park roads.

The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements with the University of Utah between regular sessions of the Legislature designating all or part of the roads within or adjacent to the research park as part of the state highway system.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

